src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!! ---------------
!! The UNDEFINED language verbs inflect in persons.

LEXICON VPrefixes
0   aeVPrefix   ;
0   akVPrefix  ;

LEXICON aeVPrefix
a+    aeVerbs   ;
{eɛ}+    aeVerbs   ;
a+ki+    aeVerbs   ;

LEXICON akVPrefix
a+k+ akVerbs   ;
{eɛ}+k+ akVerbs   ;

LEXICON aVSuffixes
a+    VSuffixes   ;

LEXICON iVSuffixes
i+    VSuffixes   ;

LEXICON oVSuffixes
o+  VSuffixes   ;

LEXICON ɪVSuffixes
ɪ+  VSuffixes   ;

LEXICON VSuffixes
+e[+ATRdom]         #   ;
+ɛ+rɛ[-ATRdom]    #   ;
+{uʊ}n              #   ;
+{ao}r              #   ;
+ɔr[-ATR←NoLow]              #   ;
+k{iɪ}n{iɪ}[NATR]         #   ;
+e[+ATR←NoLow]         #   ;
+een[+ATR←NoLow]    #   ;

    #   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
